Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.401, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Native rough fish. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding subdivision 1, the commissioner must not prescribe limits on the number of native rough fish that may be taken in one day or the number that may be possessed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end